District of Columbia statutes.
27-135

Failure to make prompt payments to a subcontractor.

If a contractor fails to make prompt payments to a subcontractor as required by § 27-134, or a first-tier subcontractor fails to make prompt payments to a second-tier subcontractor, the contractor or subcontractor shall:

(1)

Pay interest of 1.5% per month or any part of a month to the subcontractor on any undisputed amount not paid on time to the subcontractor; and

(2)

If the subcontractor prevails in a civil action to collect interest penalties from a contractor or first-tier subcontractor, the subcontractor shall be awarded its costs and disbursements, including reasonable attorney’s fees, incurred in bringing the action.

Nov. 5, 2013, D.C. Law 20-34, § 6, 60 DCR 11812

History